Utah statutes.
76-10-1603.5.   Violation a felony -- Costs -- Forfeiture -- Fines --
Divestiture -- Restrictions -- Dissolution or reorganization -- Prior
restraint.
(1)  A person who violates any provision of Section 76-10-1603 is guilty of a
second degree felony.  In addition to penalties prescribed by law, the court
may order the person found guilty of the felony to pay to the state, if the
attorney general brought the action, or to the county, if the county attorney
or district attorney brought the action, the costs of investigating and
prosecuting the offense and the costs of securing the forfeitures provided for
in this section.  The person shall forfeit:
(a)  any interest acquired or maintained in violation of any provision of
Section 76-10-1603;
(b)  any interest in, security of, claim against, or property or contractual
right of any kind affording a source of influence over any enterprise which
the person has established, operated, controlled, conducted, or participated
in the conduct of in violation of Section 76-10-1603; and
(c)  any property constituting or derived from the net proceeds which the
person obtained, directly or indirectly, from the conduct constituting the
pattern of unlawful activity or from any act or conduct constituting the
pattern of unlawful activity proven as part of the violation of any provision
of Section 76-10-1603.
(2)  If a violation of Section 76-10-1603 is based on a pattern of unlawful
activity consisting of acts or conduct in violation of Section 76-10-1204,
76-10-1205, 76-10-1206, or 76-10-1222, the property subject to forfeiture
under this section is limited to property, the seizure or forfeiture of which
would not constitute a prior restraint on the exercise of an affected party's
rights under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or
Utah Constitution Article I, Section 15, or would not otherwise unlawfully
interfere with the exercise of those rights.
(3)  In lieu of a fine otherwise authorized by law for a violation of Section
76-10-1603, a defendant who derives net proceeds from a conduct prohibited by
Section 76-10-1603 may be fined not more than twice the amount of the net
proceeds.
(4)  Property subject to forfeiture in accordance with the procedures and
substantive protections of Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture
Procedures Act:
(a)  includes:
(i)  real property, including things growing on, affixed to, and found in
land; and
(ii)  tangible and intangible personal property including money, rights,
privileges, interests, claims, and securities of any kind; but
(b)  does not include property exchanged or to be exchanged for services
rendered in connection with the defense of the charges or any related criminal
case.
(5)  Upon conviction for violating any provision of Section 76-10-1603, and in
addition to any penalty prescribed by law and in addition to any forfeitures
provided for in this section, the court may do any or all of the following:
(a)  order restitution to any victim or rightful owner of property obtained,
directly or indirectly, from:
(i)  the conduct constituting the pattern of unlawful activity; or
(ii)  any act or conduct constituting the pattern of unlawful activity that is
proven as part of the violation of any provision of Section 76-10-1603;
(b)  order the person to divest himself of any interest in or any control,
direct or indirect, of any enterprise;
(c)  impose reasonable restrictions on the future activities or investments of
any person, including prohibiting the person from engaging in the same type of
endeavor as the enterprise engaged in, to the extent the Utah Constitution and
the Constitution of the United States permit; or
(d)  order the dissolution or reorganization of any enterprise.
(6)  If a violation of Section 76-10-1603 is based on a pattern of unlawful
activity consisting of acts or conduct in violation of Section 76-10-1204,
76-10-1205, 76-10-1206, or 76-10-1222, the court may not enter any order that
would amount to a prior restraint on the exercise of an affected party's
rights under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or
Utah Constitution Article I, Section 15.
(7)  All rights, title, and interest in forfeitable property described in
Subsections (1) and (2) are subject to forfeiture proceedings in accordance
with the procedures and substantive protections of Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah
Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act.
(8)  For purposes of this section, the "net proceeds" of an offense means
property acquired as a result of the violation minus the direct costs of
acquiring the property.
